Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202283-906
Staffing analysis; report.

The Department of Correctional Services shall conduct a department-wide staffing analysis of all positions, including a specific analysis regarding behavioral health staffing, in an effort to make a comprehensive determination of staffing needs. Concurrently, the department shall make short-term recommendations for needed staffing, including, but not limited to, facility administrative and support positions, in order to improve the effectiveness of staffing.

The staffing analysis shall be completed and a report of its findings and subsequent staffing recommendations submitted electronically to the Legislature no later than September 15, 2020. Subsequent updates of the staffing analysis shall be completed and shall be submitted electronically to the Legislature on or before September 15, 2026, and at least every six years thereafter or more frequently at the discretion of the department.

Laws 2018, LB841, § 55.